src/clock-sjd.lexc
! Divvun & Giellatekno - open source grammars for Sámi and other languages
! Copyright © 2000-2010 The University of Tromsø & the Norwegian Sámi Parliament
! http://giellatekno.uit.no & http://divvun.no
!
! This program is free software; you can redistribute and/or modify
! this file under the terms of the GNU General Public License as published by
! the Free Software Foundation, either version 3 of the License, or
! (at your option) any later version. The GNU General Public License
! is found at http://www.gnu.org/licenses/gpl.html. It is
! also available in the file $GTHOME/LICENSE.txt.
!
! Other licensing options are available upon request, please contact
! giellatekno@hum.uit.no or divvun@samediggi.no

! ====================== !
! The Kildin Sami  clock !
! ====================== !



!!! 
!!! 
!!! 
!!! Multichar_Symbols
!!! 
!!! @U.TIME.1@ 
!!! @U.TIME.2@ 
!!! @U.TIME.3@ 
!!! @U.TIME.4@ 
!!! @U.TIME.5@ 
!!! @U.TIME.6@ 
!!! @U.TIME.7@ 
!!! @U.TIME.8@ 
!!! @U.TIME.9@ 
!!! @U.TIME.10@ 
!!! @U.TIME.11@ 
!!! @U.TIME.12@ 
!!! 
!!! +Use/NG
!!! +Use/NA
!!! 
!!! 
!!! LEXICON Root
!!!      %0: smallhour ;
!!! +Use/NA: smallhour ;
!!!          largehour ;
!!! 
!!! LEXICON smallhour
!!!   1@U.TIME.1@:@U.TIME.1@     AFTpunkt ;    !01:00 - 01:19
!!!   1@U.TIME.2@:@U.TIME.2@     BEFpunkt ;    !01:20 - 01:59
!!!   2@U.TIME.2@:@U.TIME.2@     AFTpunkt ;    !02:00 - 02:19
!!!   2@U.TIME.3@:@U.TIME.3@     BEFpunkt ;    !02:20 - 02:59
!!!   3@U.TIME.3@:@U.TIME.3@     AFTpunkt ;    !03:00 - 03:19
!!!   3@U.TIME.4@:@U.TIME.4@     BEFpunkt ;    !03:20 - 03:59
!!!   4@U.TIME.4@:@U.TIME.4@     AFTpunkt ;    !04:00 - 04:19
!!!   4@U.TIME.5@:@U.TIME.5@     BEFpunkt ;    !04:20 - 04:59
!!!   5@U.TIME.5@:@U.TIME.5@     AFTpunkt ;    !05:00 - 05:19
!!!   5@U.TIME.6@:@U.TIME.6@     BEFpunkt ;    !05:20 - 05:59
!!!   6@U.TIME.6@:@U.TIME.6@     AFTpunkt ;    !06:00 - 06:19
!!!   6@U.TIME.7@:@U.TIME.7@     BEFpunkt ;    !06:20 - 06:59
!!!   7@U.TIME.7@:@U.TIME.7@     AFTpunkt ;    !07:00 - 07:19
!!!   7@U.TIME.8@:@U.TIME.8@     BEFpunkt ;    !07:20 - 07:59
!!!   8@U.TIME.8@:@U.TIME.8@     AFTpunkt ;    !08:00 - 08:19
!!!   8@U.TIME.9@:@U.TIME.9@     BEFpunkt ;    !08:20 - 08:59
!!!   9@U.TIME.9@:@U.TIME.9@     AFTpunkt ;    !09:00 - 09:19
!!!   9@U.TIME.10@:@U.TIME.10@   BEFpunkt ;  !09:20 - 09:59
!!! 
!!! LEXICON largehour
!!! 1%0@U.TIME.10@:@U.TIME.10@   AFTpunkt ;  !10:00 - 10:19
!!! 1%0@U.TIME.11@:@U.TIME.11@   BEFpunkt ;  !10:20 - 10:59
!!! 11@U.TIME.11@:@U.TIME.11@    AFTpunkt ;   !11:00 - 11:59
!!! 11@U.TIME.12@:@U.TIME.12@    BEFpunkt ;   !11:19 - 11:59
!!! 12@U.TIME.12@:@U.TIME.12@    AFTpunkt ;   !12:00 - 12:19
!!! 12@U.TIME.1@:@U.TIME.1@      BEFpunkt ;     !12:19 - 12:59
!!! 13@U.TIME.1@+Use/NG:@U.TIME.1@      AFTpunkt ;     !13:00 - 13:19
!!! 13@U.TIME.2@+Use/NG:@U.TIME.2@      BEFpunkt ;     !13:19 - 13:59
!!! 14@U.TIME.2@+Use/NG:@U.TIME.2@      AFTpunkt ;     !14:00 - 114:19
!!! 14@U.TIME.3@+Use/NG:@U.TIME.3@      BEFpunkt ;     !14:19 - 14:59
!!! 15@U.TIME.3@+Use/NG:@U.TIME.3@      AFTpunkt ;     !15:00 - 15:19
!!! 15@U.TIME.4@+Use/NG:@U.TIME.4@      BEFpunkt ;     !15:19 - 15:59
!!! 16@U.TIME.4@+Use/NG:@U.TIME.4@      AFTpunkt ;     !16:00 - 16:19
!!! 16@U.TIME.5@+Use/NG:@U.TIME.5@      BEFpunkt ;     !16:19 - 16:59
!!! 17@U.TIME.5@+Use/NG:@U.TIME.5@      AFTpunkt ;     !17:00 - 17:19
!!! 17@U.TIME.6@+Use/NG:@U.TIME.6@      BEFpunkt ;     !17:19 - 17:59
!!! 18@U.TIME.6@+Use/NG:@U.TIME.6@      AFTpunkt ;     !18:00 - 18:19
!!! 18@U.TIME.7@+Use/NG:@U.TIME.7@      BEFpunkt ;     !18:19 - 18:59
!!! 19@U.TIME.7@+Use/NG:@U.TIME.7@      AFTpunkt ;     !19:00 - 19:19
!!! 19@U.TIME.8@+Use/NG:@U.TIME.8@      BEFpunkt ;     !19:20 - 19:59
!!! 2%0@U.TIME.8@+Use/NG:@U.TIME.8@     AFTpunkt ;    !20:00 - 20:19
!!! 2%0@U.TIME.9@+Use/NG:@U.TIME.9@     BEFpunkt ;    !20:20 - 20:59
!!! 21@U.TIME.9@+Use/NG:@U.TIME.9@      AFTpunkt ;     !21:00 - 21:19
!!! 21@U.TIME.10@+Use/NG:@U.TIME.10@    BEFpunkt ;   !21:20 - 21:59
!!! 22@U.TIME.10@+Use/NG:@U.TIME.10@    AFTpunkt ;   !22:00 - 22:19
!!! 22@U.TIME.11@+Use/NG:@U.TIME.11@    BEFpunkt ;   !22:19 - 22:59
!!! 23@U.TIME.11@+Use/NG:@U.TIME.11@    AFTpunkt ;   !23:00 - 23:19
!!! 23@U.TIME.12@+Use/NG:@U.TIME.12@    BEFpunkt ;   !23:19 - 23:59
!!! 24%:%0%0+Use/NG:кӯххтемплоагкь       # ;      !24:00
!!! %0%0@U.TIME.12@:@U.TIME.12@  AFTpunkt ; !00:00 - 00:19
!!! %0%0@U.TIME.1@:@U.TIME.1@  BEFpunkt ; !00:19 - 00:59
!!! 
!!! 
!!!  LEXICON BEFpunkt
!!!  %:+Use/NA: BEF ;
!!!  %.+Use/NA: BEF ;
!!! 
!!! LEXICON AFTpunkt
!!!  %:+Use/NA: AFT ;  ! 2:00 = göökte
!!!  %.+Use/NA: AFT ;  ! 2.00 = göökte
!!!  +Use/NA:  HOUR ;  ! 2    = göökte
!!! 
!!! LEXICON BEF
!!! 2%0:лоагкь%               TOHALF ;
!!!  21:аххц%              TOHALF ; ! аххц
!!!  22:ка̄ххц%             TOHALF ;
!!!  23:кыджемь%              TOHALF ;
!!!  24:кудт%              TOHALF ;
!!!  25:выдт%             TOHALF ;  
!!!  26:не̄лльй%           TOHALF ;  
!!!  27:ко̄ллм%             TOHALF ;
!!!  28:кӯххт%             TOHALF ; 
!!!  29:э̄ххт%               TOHALF ;
!!!  29+Use/NG:минута%     TOHALF ;
!!!  3%0:пе̄лль%               HOUR ;
!!!  31:э̄ххт%               OVERHALF ;
!!!  31+Use/NG:минута%     OVERHALF ;
!!!  32:кӯххт%              OVERHALF ;
!!!  33:ко̄ллм%              OVERHALF ;
!!!  34:не̄лльй%             OVERHALF ;
!!!  35:выдт%             OVERHALF ;
!!!  36:кудт%              OVERHALF ;
!!!  37:кыджемь%              OVERHALF ;
!!!  38:ка̄ххц%             OVERHALF ; 
!!!  39:аххц%              OVERHALF ;
!!!  4%0:лоагкь%              OVERHALF ;
!!!  41:аххцэмплоагкь%     TO ;
!!!  42:ка̄ххцэмплоагкь%    TO ;
!!!  43:кыджемьемплоагкь%     TO ;
!!!  44:кудтэмплоагкь%     TO ;
!!!  45:kvárta%            TO ;
!!!  46:не̄лльемплоагкь%  TO ;
!!!  47:ко̄ллмэмплоагкь%    TO ;
!!!  48:кӯххтемплоагкь%    TO ;
!!!  49:э̄ххтэмплоагкь%      TO ;
!!!  5%0:лоагкь%              TO ;
!!!  51:аххц%              TO ;
!!!  52:ка̄ххц%             TO ;
!!!  53:кыджемь%              TO ;
!!!  54:кудт%              TO ;
!!!  55:выдт%             TO ;  
!!!  56:не̄лльй%           TO ;  
!!!  57:ко̄ллм%             TO ;
!!!  58:кӯххт%             TO ; 
!!!  59:э̄ххт%               TO ;
!!!  59+Use/NG:минута%     TO ;
!!! 
!!! 
!!! LEXICON AFT
!!! %0%0:                    HOUR ;
!!!  %01:э̄ххт%               OVER ;
!!!  %01+Use/NG:минута%     OVER ;
!!!  %02:кӯххт%             OVER ;
!!!  %03:ко̄ллм%             OVER ;
!!!  %04:не̄лльй%           OVER ;
!!!  %05:выдт%             OVER ;
!!!  %06:кудт%              OVER ;
!!!  %07:кыджемь%              OVER ;
!!!  %08:ка̄ххц%             OVER ;
!!!  %09:аххц%              OVER ;
!!!  1%0:лоагкь%               OVER ;
!!!  11:э̄ххтэмплоагкь%       OVER ;
!!!  12:кӯххтемплоагкь%     OVER ;
!!!  13:ко̄ллмэмплоагкь%     OVER ;
!!!  14:не̄лльемплоагкь%   OVER ;
!!!  15:kvárta%                OVER ;
!!!  16:кудтэмплоагкь%      OVER ;
!!!  17:кыджемьемплоагкь%      OVER ;
!!!  18:ка̄ххцэмплоагкь%     OVER ;
!!!  19:аххцэмплоагкь%      OVER ;
!!! 
!!! LEXICON TOHALF
!!!  :váile% пе̄лль%    HOUR ;
!!! 
!!! LEXICON OVERHALF
!!!  :badjel% пе̄лль%     HOUR ;
!!! 
!!! LEXICON TO
!!!  :váile%    HOUR ;
!!! 
!!! LEXICON OVER
!!!  :badjel%   HOUR ;
!!! 
!!! LEXICON HOUR
!!! NOMHOUR ; !^N^
!!! !LOCHOUR ; !^L^ 
!!! 
!!! 
!!! LEXICON NOMHOUR                              
!!! @U.TIME.1@:э̄ххт@U.TIME.1@ # ;                
!!! @U.TIME.2@:кӯххт@U.TIME.2@ # ;              
!!! @U.TIME.3@:ко̄ллм@U.TIME.3@ # ;              
!!! @U.TIME.4@:не̄лльй@U.TIME.4@ # ;            
!!! @U.TIME.5@:выдт@U.TIME.5@ # ;              
!!! @U.TIME.6@:кудт@U.TIME.6@ # ;              
!!! @U.TIME.7@:кыджемь@U.TIME.7@ # ;               
!!! @U.TIME.8@:ка̄ххц@U.TIME.8@ # ;              
!!! @U.TIME.9@:аххц@U.TIME.9@ # ;               
!!! @U.TIME.10@:лоагкь@U.TIME.10@ # ;              
!!! @U.TIME.11@:э̄ххтэмплоагкь@U.TIME.11@ # ;   
!!! @U.TIME.12@:кӯххтемплоагкь@U.TIME.12@ # ; 
!!! 
!!! ! Outcommented due to Oahpa. Insert again ad lib.
!!! ! LEXICON LOCHOUR                             
!!! ! @U.TIME.1@:ovttas@U.TIME.1@ # ;             
!!! ! @U.TIME.2@:guovttis@U.TIME.2@ # ;           
!!! ! @U.TIME.3@:golmmas@U.TIME.3@ # ;            
!!! ! @U.TIME.4@:njealjis@U.TIME.4@ # ;           
!!! ! @U.TIME.5@:viđas@U.TIME.5@ # ;              
!!! ! @U.TIME.6@:guđas@U.TIME.6@ # ;              
!!! ! @U.TIME.7@:čiežas@U.TIME.7@ # ;             
!!! ! @U.TIME.8@:gávccis@U.TIME.8@ # ;            
!!! ! @U.TIME.9@:ovccis@U.TIME.9@ # ;             
!!! ! @U.TIME.10@:logis@U.TIME.10@ # ;            
!!! ! @U.TIME.11@:oktanuppelogis@U.TIME.11@ # ;   
!!! ! @U.TIME.12@:guoktenuppelogis@U.TIME.12@ # ; 
!!! 


!!! Den rusiske versjonen
!!! Den rusiske versjonen
!!! Den rusiske versjonen
!!! Den rusiske versjonen

! Note that this is a __Russian__ clock
! (who will ever note the difference ;-)
! ... awaiting a Kildin Sami one.

! 5:00 выдант ча̄ссэ
! 6:20 кӯххтлоагкь минута седьмого???
! 9:30 половина десятого
! 9:30 полдесятого
! 4:45 без четверти пять 
! 4:45 без пятнадцати пять

! 6:20 двадцать минут седьмого



Multichar_Symbols

@U.TIME.1@ 
@U.TIME.2@ 
@U.TIME.3@ 
@U.TIME.4@ 
@U.TIME.5@ 
@U.TIME.6@ 
@U.TIME.7@ 
@U.TIME.8@ 
@U.TIME.9@ 
@U.TIME.10@ 
@U.TIME.11@ 
@U.TIME.12@ 

+Use/NG
+Use/NA


LEXICON Root

BEFORE ; ! 31-59
!HALF ;
REST ; ! 1-30

LEXICON BEFORE
:без%    BEFOREHOURS ;

LEXICON BEFOREHOURS
     %0: beforesmallhours ;
+Use/NA: beforesmallhours ;
         beforelargehours ;

LEXICON beforesmallhours
1@U.TIME.2@:@U.TIME.2@     BEFpunkt ;    !01:31 - 01:59
2@U.TIME.3@:@U.TIME.3@     BEFpunkt ;    !02:31 - 02:59
3@U.TIME.4@:@U.TIME.4@     BEFpunkt ;    !03:31 - 03:59
4@U.TIME.5@:@U.TIME.5@     BEFpunkt ;    !04:31 - 04:59
5@U.TIME.6@:@U.TIME.6@     BEFpunkt ;    !05:31 - 05:59
6@U.TIME.7@:@U.TIME.7@     BEFpunkt ;    !06:31 - 06:59
7@U.TIME.8@:@U.TIME.8@     BEFpunkt ;    !07:31 - 07:59
8@U.TIME.9@:@U.TIME.9@     BEFpunkt ;    !08:31 - 08:59
9@U.TIME.10@:@U.TIME.10@   BEFpunkt ;  !09:31 - 09:59

LEXICON beforelargehours
1%0@U.TIME.11@:@U.TIME.11@   BEFpunkt ;  !10:31 - 10:59
11@U.TIME.12@:@U.TIME.12@    BEFpunkt ;   !11:29 - 11:59
12@U.TIME.1@:@U.TIME.1@      BEFpunkt ;     !12:29 - 12:59
13@U.TIME.2@:@U.TIME.2@      BEFpunkt ;     !13:29 - 13:59
14@U.TIME.3@:@U.TIME.3@      BEFpunkt ;     !14:29 - 14:59
15@U.TIME.4@:@U.TIME.4@      BEFpunkt ;     !15:29 - 15:59
16@U.TIME.5@:@U.TIME.5@      BEFpunkt ;     !16:29 - 16:59
17@U.TIME.6@:@U.TIME.6@      BEFpunkt ;     !17:29 - 17:59
18@U.TIME.7@:@U.TIME.7@      BEFpunkt ;     !18:29 - 18:59
19@U.TIME.8@:@U.TIME.8@      BEFpunkt ;     !19:31 - 19:59
2%0@U.TIME.9@:@U.TIME.9@     BEFpunkt ;    !20:31 - 20:59
21@U.TIME.10@:@U.TIME.10@    BEFpunkt ;   !21:31 - 21:59
22@U.TIME.11@:@U.TIME.11@    BEFpunkt ;   !22:29 - 22:59
23@U.TIME.12@:@U.TIME.12@    BEFpunkt ;   !23:29 - 23:59
%0%0@U.TIME.1@:@U.TIME.1@  BEFpunkt ; !00:29 - 00:59
